Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-810
Private social services institution, defined.

Private social services institution means any private not-for-profit corporation or institution that (1) provides health, safety, and welfare assistance, including emergency, social, housing, and related support services, to members of the general public in the state, (2) is described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, (3) is located within this state and is not owned or controlled by the state or any political subdivision, agency, instrumentality, district, or municipality thereof, and (4) does not violate any Nebraska or federal law against discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, national origin, ancestry, age, gender, handicap, or military or veteran status.

Laws 2013, LB170, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 97.